Massachusetts, session 194th, H4888.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Children 
and Families (DCF) shall establish a sick leave bank for Marnie Jean Goldstein, an employee of 
the department. Any employee of the department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, 
personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Marnie Jean Goldstein. If Marnie Jean 
Goldstein terminates employment with the department or requests to dissolve the sick leave 
bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave 
bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability 
that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the department.